src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51viisidekiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:sittädekiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltädekiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:sillädekiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:silledekiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinedekiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistädekiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinädekiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:siendekiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siindekiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissädekiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sindekiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detdekiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siädekiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksidekiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettädekiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltädekiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:dellädekiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:delledekiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destädekiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenädekiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:dendekiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teendekiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessädekiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sidekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttädekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksidekiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51viisiduodekiljardia

+Pl+Abe:sittäduodekiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltäduodekiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:silläduodekiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:silleduodekiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sineduodekiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistäduodekiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinäduodekiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienduodekiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinduodekiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissäduodekiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sinduodekiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detduodekiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siäduodekiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksiduodekiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettäduodekiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltäduodekiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:delläduodekiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:delleduodekiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destäduodekiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenäduodekiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denduodekiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenduodekiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessäduodekiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:siduodekiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttäduodekiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksiduodekiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51viisiduodekiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:sittäduodekiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltäduodekiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:silläduodekiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:silleduodekiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sineduodekiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistäduodekiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinäduodekiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienduodekiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinduodekiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissäduodekiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sinduodekiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detduodekiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siäduodekiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksiduodekiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettäduodekiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltäduodekiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:delläduodekiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:delleduodekiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destäduodekiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenäduodekiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denduodekiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenduodekiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessäduodekiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:siduodekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttäduodekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksiduodekiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51viisikahdeksatta

+Pl+Abe:sittäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:silläkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:delläkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51viisikiljardia

+Pl+Abe:sittäkiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltäkiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:silläkiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistäkiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinäkiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissäkiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sinkiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siäkiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettäkiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltäkiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:delläkiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destäkiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenäkiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessäkiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttäkiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51viisikiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:sittäkiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:siltäkiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:silläkiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:sillekiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:sinekiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:sistäkiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:sinäkiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:sienkiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:siinkiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:sissäkiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:sinkiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:detkiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:siäkiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:siksikiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:dettäkiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:deltäkiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:delläkiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:dellekiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:destäkiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:tenäkiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:denkiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:teenkiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:dessäkiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sikiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ttäkiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:deksikiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
viisidekiljoonaa+Num:vii  NUM_51viisidekiljoonaa  ;
viisiduodekiljardia+Num:vii  NUM_51viisiduodekiljardia  ;
viisiduodekiljoonaa+Num:vii  NUM_51viisiduodekiljoonaa  ;
viisikahdeksatta+Num:vii  NUM_51viisikahdeksatta  ;
viisikiljardia+Num:vii  NUM_51viisikiljardia  ;
viisikiljoonaa+Num:vii  NUM_51viisikiljoonaa  ;
